Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.020

Powers of director.

(1) The director shall enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter pertaining to garbage feeding.

(2) The director has the authority to regulate the sale, distribution, and use of veterinary biologics in the state and may adopt rules to restrict the sale, distribution, or use of any veterinary biologic in any manner necessary to protect the health and safety of the public and the state's animal population.

(3) The director has the authority to license and regulate the activities of veterinary laboratories that do not have a veterinarian licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW present within the management or staff of the veterinary laboratory. The director may adopt rules to regulate these laboratories in any manner necessary to protect the health and safety of the public and the public's animals.

[ 1998 c 8 s 3; 1987 c 163 s 2; 1979 c 154 s 8; 1953 c 17 s 2; 1947 c 172 s 1; 1933 c 177 s 1; 1927 c 165 s 1; formerly Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3110. Prior: 1915 c 100 s 5; 1901 c 112 s 2; 1895 c 167 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 154: See note following RCW 15.49.330.